Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska42-910
Department; services for children; enumerated.

The department shall provide services for children which may include:

(1) Emergency services which provide housing, food, clothing, and transportation to school;

(2) Counseling for trauma which occurs when children witness or experience family violence;

(3) Programs which provide for the appropriate educational needs of the individual child; and

(4) Services for child care in the necessary absence of the victim parent.

Laws 1978, LB 623, § 10.